Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.130

State, personal, nonliability—Obligations limited by collections—Defense to certain civil or criminal actions.

Neither the state, nor any member, agent, or employee of the commission, is liable for the acts of the commission, or upon its contracts.

All salaries, expenses, costs, obligations, and liabilities of the commission, and claims arising from the administration of this chapter, are payable only from funds collected under this chapter.

In any civil or criminal action or proceeding for violation of any rule of [or] statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade, including any action under chapter 19.86 RCW, proof that the act complained of was done in compliance with the provisions of this chapter, and in furtherance of the purposes and provisions of this chapter, is a complete defense to such an action or proceeding.

[ 2002 c 313 s 107; 1961 c 11 s 15.28.130. Prior: 1947 c 73 s 16; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-25.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.